Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1274.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "marihuana" in section 2(b) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended and the subsection is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.--* * *(b) As used in this act:* * *"Container" means the innermost wrapping, packaging or vessel in direct contact with a final hemp-derived cannabinoid product 12345678910111213141516171819202122 in which the final hemp-derived cannabinoid product is enclosed for retail sale to consumers. The term does not include bulk shipping containers or outer wrappings that are not essential for the final retail delivery or sale to an end consumer for personal or household use.* * *"Final hemp-derived cannabinoid product" means a hemp-derived cannabinoid product that is in the final form or preparation marketed or intended to be used or consumed by a human or animal and is not an intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid product."Hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a total tetrahydrocannabinols concentration, including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, of not more than three-tenths percent on a dry weight basis. The term:(1) Includes industrial hemp.(2) Does not include:(i) any viable seeds from a Cannabis sativa L. plant that exceeds a total tetrahydrocannabinols concentration, including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, of three-tenths percent in the plant on a dry weight basis;(ii) any intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products containing:(A) cannabinoids that are not capable of being naturally produced by a Cannabis sativa L. plant;(B) cannabinoids that:(I) are capable of being naturally produced by a Cannabis sativa L. plant; and20260SB1274PN1613 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II) were synthesized or manufactured outside the plant; or(C) more than three-tenths percent combined total of:(I) total tetrahydrocannabinols, including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid; and(II) any other cannabinoids that have similar effects or are marketed to have similar effects on humans or animals as a tetrahydrocannabinol as determined by the Secretary of Health and Human Services;(iii) any intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products which are marketed or sold as a final product or directly to an end consumer for personal or household use; or(iv) any final hemp-derived cannabinoid products containing:(A) cannabinoids that are not capable of being naturally produced by a Cannabis sativa L. plant;(B) cannabinoids that:(I) are capable of being naturally produced by a Cannabis sativa L. plant; and(II) were synthesized or manufactured outside the plant; or(C) greater than 0.4 milligrams combined total per container of:(I) total tetrahydrocannabinols, including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid; and(II) any other cannabinoids that have similar effects or are marketed to have similar effects on humans or animals as a tetrahydrocannabinol as determined by the Secretary of Health and Human Services."Hemp-derived cannabinoid product" means any intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid product or final hemp-derived product derived from hemp that contains cannabinoids in any form and is intended for human or animal use through any means of 20260SB1274PN1613 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application or administration such as inhalation, ingestion or topical application. The term does not include a drug that is the subject of an application approved under 21 U.S.C. § 355(c) or (j) (relating to new drugs) or any product authorized for purchase or obtained through the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the "Medical Marijuana Act."* * *"Industrial hemp" means hemp:(1) grown for the use of the stalk of the plant, fiber produced from a stalk or any other noncannabinoid derivative, mixture, preparation or manufacture of a stalk;(2) grown for the use of the whole grain, oil, cake, nut, hull or any other noncannabinoid compound, derivative, mixture, preparation or manufacture of the seeds of the plant;(3) grown for purposes of producing microgreens or other edible hemp leaf products intended for human consumption that are derived from an immature hemp plant that is grown from seeds that do not exceed the threshold for total tetrahydrocannabinols concentration specified in the definition of "hemp";(4) that is a plant that does not enter the stream of commerce and is intended to support hemp research at an institution of higher education as defined in 20 U.S.C. § 1001 (relating to general definition of institution of higher education) or an independent research institute; or(5) grown for the use of a viable seed of the plant produced solely for the production or manufacture of any material."Intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid product" means a hemp-derived cannabinoid product which:(1) is not yet in the final form or preparation marketed or intended to be used or consumed by a human or animal; or20260SB1274PN1613 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) is a powder, liquid, tablet, oil or other product form which is intended or marketed to be mixed, dissolved, formulated or otherwise added to or prepared with or into any other substance prior to administration or consumption.* * *"Marihuana" consists of all forms, species and/or varieties of the genus Cannabis sativa L., whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of such plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds or resin, including hemp-derived cannabinoid products; but shall not include tetrahydrocannabinols, the mature stalks of such plant, fiber produced from such stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of such plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, cake, or the sterilized seed of such plant which is incapable of germination.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.1. Medical Marihuana Exemption.--The growth, processing, manufacture, acquisition, transportation, sale, dispensing, distribution, possession and consumption of marihuana derived from a medical marijuana organization as defined in the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the "Medical Marijuana Act," or pursuant to the medical marijuana program under the "Medical Marijuana Act" shall not be deemed to be a violation of this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect November 12, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260SB1274PN1613 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829